Utah statutes.
53B-18-1001.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Alliance" means the Utah Heritage Highway 89 Alliance.

(2)  "Center" means the Mormon Pioneer Heritage Center.

(3)  "Counties" means the counties of Sanpete, Sevier, Piute, Wayne, Garfield, and Kane.

